Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-206
Covenant for title; effective words.

Unless such intention is expressly negatived by the language in the instrument, a covenant in a conveyance of real property that the grantor is seized, or lawfully seized, or words to like effect, shall be interpreted as a covenant that the grantor has good title to the very estate in quantity and quality which he purports to convey.

Laws 1923, c. 111, § 1, p. 269;

C.S.1929, § 76-110;

R.S.1943, § 76-206.

Grantor had good title to estate in quality and quantity. Gettel v. Hester, 165 Neb. 573, 86 N.W.2d 613 (1957).